Washington statutes.
RCW 19.120.905

Effective date—1986 c 320.

(1) Sections 20 and 21 are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions and shall take effect immediately.

(2) Sections 1 through 19, 22 and 23 of this act shall take effect June 30, 1986.

[ 1986 c 320 s 24.]